Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1302
Terms, defined.

For the purposes of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Retirement subdivision shall mean any land which is divided or proposed to be divided into ten or more lots, whether contiguous or not, for the purpose of sale or lease as part of a common promotional plan when such subdivision is advertised or represented as a retirement subdivision or as a subdivision primarily for retirees or elderly persons, or when there is a minimum age limit tending to attract persons who are nearing retirement age;

(2) Retirement community shall mean any complex or proposed complex of more than ten units, whether contained in one or more buildings or whether constructed on separate lots, offered for sale or lease as part of a common promotional plan when such community is advertised or represented as a retirement community or as a community primarily for retirees or elderly persons, or when there is a minimum age limit tending to attract persons who are nearing retirement age;

(3) Unit shall mean any apartment or structure intended primarily as a residence and consisting of one or more rooms occupying all or part of a floor or floors in a building of one or more floors or stories, including a single residence dwelling;

(4) Common promotional plan shall include an offer for sale or lease of lots or units in a retirement subdivision or community by a single developer, or a group of developers acting in concert when such lots or units are contiguous, or are known, designated, or advertised as a common entity or by a common name;

(5) Person shall mean an individual, unincorporated organization, partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, trust, or estate;

(6) Developer shall mean any person who, directly or indirectly, sells or leases, or offers to sell or lease, or advertises for sale or lease any lots in a retirement subdivision or any units in a retirement community;

(7) Agent shall mean any person who represents or acts for or on behalf of a developer in selling or leasing or offering to sell or lease any lot or lots in a retirement subdivision or any units in a retirement community, but shall not include an attorney at law whose representation of a developer consists solely of rendering legal services;

(8) State shall mean the State of Nebraska;

(9) Purchaser shall mean a person who acquires by deed, lease, or other contract the use and occupancy of any lot or unit in a retirement subdivision or community;

(10) Offer shall include any inducement, solicitation, or attempt to encourage a person to acquire a lot or unit in a retirement subdivision or community;

(11) Disposition shall include sale, lease, assignment, award by lottery, or any other transaction by which a person acquires the use or occupancy of a lot or unit in a retirement subdivision or community;

(12) Agency shall mean the State Real Estate Commission;

(13) Lease shall mean a contract for the use and occupancy of real estate primarily as a residence when the contract term is for more than one year or is for life and when the lessee is required to pay an entrance fee;

(14) Managing agent shall mean a person who undertakes for any compensation the duties, responsibilities, or obligations of the management of a retirement subdivision or community;

(15) Audited financial statements shall mean balance sheet, income statement, retained earnings statement, cash-flow statement, and related notes, audited by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards;

(16) Prospective financial statements shall mean a financial forecast as defined by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants of the revenue, expenses, working capital needs, and other financial requirements for the retirement subdivision or community for the development period and three fiscal years after the date of initial occupancy;

(17) Actuarial forecast shall mean an analysis which is performed by a qualified actuary in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles and practices and which includes a statement of actuarial opinion, a pricing analysis, a cash-flow projection, and a statement of applicable actuarial methodology, formulas, and assumptions;

(18) Entrance fee shall mean an initial or deferred transfer to the developer of a sum of money or other property made or promised to be made as full or partial consideration for acceptance of a specified individual as a purchaser or resident of a retirement subdivision or community if the amount is more than reasonably necessary to cover a damage deposit and an advance of the first and last month's rent; and

(19) Association shall mean the person responsible to a purchaser, either directly or indirectly or through a managing agent, for the management of a retirement subdivision or community, including collecting from purchasers any periodic payments for maintenance of common areas or debt payments. A developer may be an association.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 483;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 2.